Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
PART 4 Optical Scanning Voting Systems
21-2-379.
Arrangements for appropriate ballots when use of optical scanning voting systems impracticable.

If a method of nomination or election for any candidate or office, or of voting on any question is prescribed by law, in which the use of optical scanning voting systems is not possible or practicable, or in case, at any primary or election, the number of candidates seeking nomination or nominated for any office renders the use of optical scanning voting systems for such office at such primary or election impracticable, or if, for any other reason, at any primary or election the use of optical scanning voting systems wholly or in part is not practicable, the superintendent may arrange to have the voting for such candidates or offices or for such questions conducted by any other lawful method authorized in this chapter. In such cases, appropriate ballots shall be printed for such candidates, offices, or questions, and the primary or election shall be conducted by the poll officers, and the ballots shall be counted and return thereof made in the manner required by law for such method.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-379

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, § 37; Ga. L. 1999, p. 29, § 1.